Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 17
[OLD]

VACANCIES

REPEALED. L 1970, c 26, §3.

CHAPTER 17

VACANCIES

Section

17-1 United States senator

17-2 United States representative

17-3 State senator

17-4 State representatives

17-5 Repealed

17-6 Repealed

17-7 Board of trustees, office of Hawaiian
affairs

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next